South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3461.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (12) South Carolina gross income does not include wages earned by a first responder while performing the duties of a first responder. For the purposes of this item, "first responder" means an emergency medical services provider, a law enforcement officer, including an officer or employee of the United States, a state, political subdivision of a state, or the District of Columbia, who is authorized to enforce laws, a fire department worker, or a 911 dispatcher directly engaged in examining, treating, or directing persons during an emergency. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----